Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 18. Protection of Aids to Navigation.

§ 62.1-187.
Punishment of offenses relating to buoys, beacons or day marks.

Any person or persons who shall moor any vessel or vessels of any kind or name whatsoever or any raft or any part of a raft to any buoy, beacon, or day mark, placed in the waters of Virginia by authority of the United States or shall in any manner hang on with any vessel or raft or any part of a raft to any such buoy, beacon, or day mark, or shall willfully remove, damage or destroy any such buoy, beacon or day mark, or shall cut down, remove, damage or destroy any beacon or beacons erected on land in this Commonwealth by the authority of the United States or through unavoidable accident run down, drag from its position, or in any way injure any buoy, beacon, or day mark as aforesaid and shall fail to give notice as soon as practicable of having done so to the harbor master or other legal manager of the port or to the United States Coast Guard within the district in which such buoy, beacon or day mark may be located, shall for every such offense be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $200 or by imprisonment not to exceed three months or both; one-third of the fine in each case shall be paid to the informer and two-thirds thereof to the lighthouse board to be used in repairing the buoys and beacons.

Any person having charge of any raft passing any buoy, beacon or day mark who shall not exercise due diligence in keeping clear of it, or if unavoidably fouling it shall not exercise due diligence in clearing it without dragging from it such buoy, beacon or day mark shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by fine not to exceed fifty dollars.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-175; 1968, c. 659.

Cross references.

As to arrests for violation of this chapter, with or without warrants, see §

28.2-900

.

§ 62.1-188.
Lien for cost of repairing or replacing buoy, beacon or day mark.

The cost of repairing or replacing any such buoy, beacon, or day mark which may have been misplaced, damaged, or destroyed by any vessel or raft whatsoever having been made fast to any such buoy, beacon, or day mark shall, when the same shall be legally ascertained, be a lien upon such vessel or raft and may be recovered against such vessel or raft and the owner or owners thereof in an action of debt in any court of competent jurisdiction in this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-176; 1968, c. 659.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.04 Equity. Bryson.

§ 62.1-189.
Anchoring on range of range lights.

It shall be unlawful for any vessel to anchor on the range of any range lights established by the United States unless such anchorage is unavoidable, and the master of any vessel so anchoring shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed fifty dollars, one-half of the fine in each case to be paid to the informer and one-half to the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-177; 1968, c. 659.